Alaska statutes. Title 2. Aeronautics.
Article 1. Airport Zoning Regulations.

Sec. 02.25.010.
Airport zoning regulations.

A person may not erect or permit to grow an airport hazard on land adjacent to the end of a runway of a public airport without a permit issued by the department. The area upon which these hazards are prohibited is the width of the runway, and extends from the airport boundary at the end of the runway, away from the runway in a direction parallel to its centerline for a distance equal to the length of the runway. An obstruction situated in an area not previously designated as an airport hazard area by the department is not a hazard if its height does not exceed five feet for each 200 feet distance from the boundary of the airport. The vertical measurement of the structure starts on the same plane as the surface of the runway.

History.

(§ 2(1) ch 12 SLA 1951)

Collateral references. —

Use of land adjoining an airport interfering with aircraft operation as a nuisance. 25 ALR2d 1454.

Airport operations or flight of aircraft as nuisance. 79 ALR3d 253.

Construction of new building or structure devoted to nonconforming use as zoning violation. 10 ALR4th 1122.

Zoning regulations limiting use of property near airport as taking of property. 18 ALR4th 542.

Sec. 02.25.020.
Power to adopt regulations.

In addition to, or in place of, the airport hazard area described in AS

02.25.010

, the department may adopt, administer, and enforce, under the police power and in the manner and upon the conditions prescribed in this chapter, airport zoning regulations for any airport within this state dividing the area surrounding the airport into zones. Within these zones, the department may specify the land uses permitted, and regulate and restrict the height to which structures and trees may be erected or allowed to grow, and require the abatement of lights, or electronic signals or emissions that may create a hazard to the operation of aircraft. In adopting or revising zoning regulations, the department shall consider, among other things, the character of the flying operations to be conducted at the airport, the nature of the terrain, the height of existing structures and trees above the level of the airport, the possibility of lowering or removing existing obstructions, and the views of the agency of the federal government charged with fostering civil aeronautics as to the aerial approaches necessary to safe flying operations at the airport.

History.

(§ 2(2) ch 12 SLA 1951)

Administrative Code. —

For international airports generally, see 17 AAC 42, art. 1.

For rural airports generally, see 17 AAC 45, art. 1.

Sec. 02.25.030.
Adoption of zoning regulations.

Airport zoning regulations may not be adopted or amended under this chapter except by action of the department after a public hearing at which parties in interest and citizens have an opportunity to be heard. At least 15 days’ notice of the hearing shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published nearest the location of the airport concerned.

History.

(§ 4(1) ch 12 SLA 1951)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in the second sentence, “newspaper” was substituted for “paper” to correct a manifest error in ch 12, SLA 1951.

Administrative Code. —

For international airports generally, see 17 AAC 42, art. 1.

For rural airports generally, see 17 AAC 45, art. 1.

Sec. 02.25.040.
Publication of zoning plan.

Upon the adoption of an airport zoning plan, the department shall prepare at least two copies of the plan, showing the airport and the airport hazard area, together with the designated height limits of possible hazards. One copy of the zoning plan shall be posted conspicuously at the airport concerned, and the other copy shall be filed in the office of the department.

History.

(§ 2(3) ch 12 SLA 1951)

Sec. 02.25.050.
Pre-existing use not affected.

All airport zoning regulations adopted under this chapter shall be reasonable, and the department may not require the removal, lowering, or other change or alteration of a structure or tree not conforming to the regulations when adopted or amended, or otherwise interfere with the continuance of any nonconforming use except under AS

02.25.060

.

History.

(§ 2(4) ch 12 SLA 1951)